Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Facility” means a facility with a memory care endorsement under ORS 443.886.
(b) “Independent family council” means a group of residents, family members of resi-
dents or legal representatives of residents that meets privately, either in  person or virtually.
(c) “Resident” means an individual residing in a facility.
(2) A resident has the  right to organize and participate in resident groups in a facility,
including an independent family council.
(3) At the  time that a resident is admitted to a facility, the facility shall provide to the
resident and the resident’s legal representative:
(a) Written notice of the resident’s right to  organize and participate in resident groups
in the facility, including an independent family council; and
(b) Information about how to contact and participate  in any independent family council
that has already been formed at the facility.
(4) When an independent family council has been formed at a facility:
(a) The facility shall provide adequate space in the entry area  of the facility for the in-
dependent family council to display information about the independent family council.
(b) The facility shall provide space within the facility for the  independent family council
to meet during mutually agreed-upon times. The space must reasonably allow for privacy.
(c) If requested by the independent family council, the  facility shall take reasonable steps
to make residents and family members and legal representatives of residents aware, in a
timely manner, of upcoming meetings of the independent family council.
(d) Staff and visitors may attend  independent family council meetings only at the invi-
tation of the independent family council. All visitors, including family members and legal
representatives of residents, must comply with any general facility policies and procedures
that apply to visitors, such as sign-in and sign-out  policies and nondiscrimination and anti-
harassment policies.
(e) The facility shall designate a staff person to be responsible for responding to, or co-
ordinating a response to, any written requests  or grievances that result from the independ-
ent family council.
Enrolled Senate Bill 228 (SB 228-A) Page 1
(f) The facility  shall respond in a timely manner to any requests or grievances submitted
by the independent family council concerning issues  of resident care or life in the facility.
The facility is not required to implement any requests submitted by the independent family
council but shall, upon  request, provide a response that describes the facility’s rationale for
its decision.
(5) An independent family council may not override the rights of a resident.
(6) A facility may not:
(a) Discriminate or retaliate against  a resident based on the participation of the resident
or the resident’s family member or legal representative in an independent family council.
(b) Willfully interfere with the formation, maintenance or promotion of an  independent
family council.
Passed by Senate April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 228 (SB 228-A) Page 2